Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1369.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 710. Screening Requirements.--(a) The department, in consultation with the Office of Attorney General, the Pennsylvania State Police and each county agency, shall develop a screening process to identify a child who is a victim of human trafficking or is at risk of becoming a victim of human trafficking.(b) When a county agency has contact with an alleged dependent child, the county agency shall administer the screening process under subsection (a).(c) Upon submission of a written allegation, a juvenile 12345678910111213141516171819 probation officer shall administer the screening process under subsection (a) to an alleged delinquent child at the intake conference.(d) If a county agency or juvenile probation officer identifies a child through the screening process under subsection (a) as a victim of human trafficking, or at risk of becoming a victim of human trafficking, involving sexual servitude, the county agency or juvenile probation officer shall connect the child with specialized programs and services available, including those provided under 18 Pa.C.S. § 3062 (relating to specialized services for sexually exploited children).(e) The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"County agency." As defined in 67 Pa.C.S. § 7101 (relating to definitions)."Dependent child." As defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 6302 (relating to definitions)."Sexual servitude." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3001 (relating to definitions)."Victim of human trafficking." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3001.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260SB1369PN1775 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324